Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1141.
do enact as follows:AB1141,11Section 1. 8.35 (4) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB1141,3,528.35 (4) (b) Notwithstanding par. (a), any unspent and unencumbered moneys 3received by a candidate from the democracy trust fund shall be immediately 4transferred to any candidate who is appointed to replace that candidate upon filing 1of a proper application under s. 11.1501 (1). For qualification purposes, 2contributions received and disbursements made by the former candidate are 3considered to have been received or made by the replacement candidate. If there is 4no candidate appointed or if no proper application is filed within 7 days of the date 5on which a vacancy occurs, the moneys revert to the state.AB1141,26Section 2. 11.1108 of the statutes is amended to read:AB1141,3,14711.1108 Anonymous contributions. No committee, other than a candidate 8committee for a candidate receiving a public financing benefit under subch. XV, 9may accept an anonymous contribution exceeding $10, and a candidate committee 10for a candidate receiving a public financing benefit may not accept an anonymous 11contribution exceeding $5. If an anonymous contribution exceeds $10, or $5 in the 12case of a candidate committee for a candidate receiving a public financing benefit, 13the committee shall donate the contribution to the common school fund or to a 14charitable organization and report the donation as required under this chapter.AB1141,315Section 3. 11.1400 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1141,3,231611.1400 (5) Except as otherwise provided in ss. 19.49 (2) (b) 13. and 14. and 17(g) and, 19.554, and 11.1512, actions under this section may be brought by the 18commission or, upon the commission’s determination of probable cause, by the 19district attorney for the county where the defendant resides or, if the defendant is a 20nonresident, by the district attorney for the county where the violation is alleged to 21have occurred. For purposes of this subsection, a person other than an individual 22resides within a county if the person’s principal place of operation is located within 23that county.AB1141,41Section 4. Subchapter XV of chapter 11 [precedes 11.1500] of the statutes is 2created to read:AB1141,4,33CHAPTER 11AB1141,4,44SUBCHAPTER XVAB1141,4,55DEMOCRACY TRUST FUNDAB1141,4,6611.1500 Definitions. In this subchapter:AB1141,4,97(1) “Election campaign period” means the period beginning on the day after 8the spring primary election or the day on which a primary election would be held, if 9required, and ending on the day of the succeeding spring election.AB1141,4,1510(2) “Eligible candidate” means a candidate for the office of justice, court of 11appeals judge, or circuit court judge who has an opponent, who has qualified to 12have his or her name certified for placement on the ballot at the spring primary or 13election, and who qualifies for a public financing benefit by collecting the required 14number of qualifying contributions, making all required reports and disclosures, 15and being certified by the commission as being in compliance with this subchapter.AB1141,4,1916(3) “Exploratory period” means the period that begins after the date of a 17spring election immediately preceding a public financing qualifying period and 18ends on the first day of the public financing qualifying period for the next election 19for justice.AB1141,4,2020(4) “Immediate family” includes the candidate's spouse and children.AB1141,4,2421(5) “Nonparticipating candidate” means a candidate for the office of justice, 22court of appeals judge, or circuit court judge who does not apply for a public 23financing benefit or who is otherwise ineligible or fails to qualify for a public 24financing benefit under this subchapter.AB1141,5,21(6) “Personal funds” means funds contributed by a candidate or a member of 2a candidate's immediate family.AB1141,5,63(7) “Primary election campaign period” means the period beginning on the 4day after the last day prescribed by law for filing nomination papers for the office of 5justice and ending on the day of the spring primary election for that office or the day 6on which the primary election would be held, if required.AB1141,5,87(8) “Public financing benefit” means a benefit provided to an eligible 8candidate under this subchapter.AB1141,5,129(9) “Public financing qualifying period” means, for each election for the office 10of justice, the period beginning on the first day of July of the year immediately 11preceding the year of that election and ending on the day before the beginning of the 12primary election campaign period for that office.AB1141,5,1613(10) “Qualifying contribution” means a contribution in an amount of not less 14than $5 nor more than $100 made to a candidate committee by an elector of this 15state during the public financing qualifying period, which is acknowledged by 16written receipt identifying the contributor.AB1141,5,2217(11) “Seed money contribution” means a contribution in an amount of not 18more than $100 made to a candidate committee by an elector of this state during 19the exploratory period or the public financing qualifying period or a contribution 20made to a candidate committee consisting of personal funds of that candidate in an 21amount not more than the amount authorized under s. 11.1505 during the 22exploratory period or the public financing qualifying period.AB1141,6,72311.1501 Qualification; certification. (1) Before a candidate for justice, 24court of appeals judge, or circuit court judge in the primary election may be 1certified as an eligible candidate to receive a public financing benefit for the 2primary election campaign period, the candidate shall apply to the commission for 3a public financing benefit and file a sworn statement that the candidate has 4complied and will comply with all requirements of this subchapter throughout the 5applicable campaign, which includes the primary and election for that office. A 6candidate shall file the application and statement no later than the beginning of the 7primary election campaign period.AB1141,6,128(2) A candidate shall be certified by the commission as an eligible candidate 9for receipt of a public financing benefit for a primary election if the candidate 10complies with sub. (1) and receives qualifying contributions from at least 1,000 11separate contributors in an aggregate amount of not less than $5,000 nor more than 12$50,000 before the close of the public financing qualifying period.AB1141,6,1513(3) The commission shall verify a candidate's compliance with the 14requirements of sub. (2) by such verification and sampling techniques as the 15commission considers appropriate.AB1141,6,1616(4) Each candidate shall:AB1141,6,1817(a) Acknowledge each qualifying contribution by a receipt to the contributor 18that contains the contributor's name and home address.AB1141,6,2219(b) No later than the 15th or the last day of the month that immediately 20follows the date of receipt of a qualifying contribution, whichever comes first, file a 21copy of the receipt under par. (a) with the commission, except that during July, 22August, and September, a copy need only be filed by the last day of the month.AB1141,6,2423(5) A qualifying contribution may be used only for the purpose of making a 24disbursement.AB1141,7,9111.1502 Time of application. (1) Before a candidate for justice, court of 2appeals judge, or circuit court judge may be certified as an eligible candidate for 3receipt of a public financing benefit for the spring election, the candidate shall 4apply to the commission and file a sworn statement that the candidate has fulfilled 5all the requirements of this subchapter during the primary election campaign 6period and will comply with such requirements during the election campaign 7period. Except as authorized in s. 8.35 (4) (b), the application shall be filed no later 8than the 7th day after the date of the spring primary or the date that the primary 9election would be held if a primary were required.AB1141,7,1310(2) The commission shall certify a candidate as an eligible candidate for 11receipt of a public financing benefit for the spring election if the candidate complies 12with sub. (1) and the candidate was an eligible candidate during the primary 13election campaign period.AB1141,7,211411.1503 Agreement by candidate. An eligible candidate who accepts a 15public financing benefit under this subchapter during the primary election 16campaign period shall agree to comply with all requirements of this subchapter 17throughout the election campaign period during the same campaign as a 18precondition to receipt of a public financing benefit. An eligible candidate who 19accepts a public financing benefit during a primary election campaign period may 20not elect to accept private contributions in violation of this subchapter during the 21corresponding election campaign period.AB1141,8,22211.1504 Requirements imposed upon candidates. (1) An eligible 23candidate's candidate committee shall not accept private contributions other than 24seed money contributions and qualifying contributions that the candidate 1committee accepts during the exploratory period and the public financing 2qualifying period.AB1141,8,113(2) In addition to reports required to be filed under subch. II, the candidate 4committee of an eligible candidate who receives a public financing benefit shall 5furnish complete financial records, including records of seed money contributions, 6qualifying contributions, and disbursements, to the commission on the 15th or the 7last day of the month that immediately follows the receipt of the contribution or the 8making of the disbursement, whichever comes first, except that during July, 9August, and September, records need only be furnished by the last day of the 10month. Each such candidate committee shall cooperate with any audit or 11examination by the commission.AB1141,8,2112(3) In addition to adhering to other requirements imposed under this chapter, 13the candidate committee of an eligible candidate who receives a public financing 14benefit shall maintain records of all contributions received by the candidate 15committee of more than $5 but less than $50, including seed money contributions 16and qualifying contributions, that shall contain the full name of the contributor and 17the contributor's full home address. In addition, if a contributor's aggregate 18contributions to any candidate committee exceed $50 for any campaign, the 19candidate committee shall also maintain a record of the contributor's principal 20occupation and the name and business address of the contributor's place of 21employment.AB1141,8,2422(4) The failure to record or provide the information specified in sub. (3) 23disqualifies a contribution from being used by a candidate committee as a 24qualifying contribution.AB1141,9,41(5) No eligible candidate, candidate committee of the eligible candidate, or 2any person acting on the eligible candidate's behalf may deposit any contribution 3that is not recorded in accordance with sub. (3) in a depository account of the 4eligible candidate's candidate committee.AB1141,9,95(6) No eligible candidate or candidate committee of an eligible candidate may 6accept more than $25 in cash from any contributor. No eligible candidate or 7candidate committee of an eligible candidate may accept cash from all sources in a 8total amount greater than one-tenth of 1 percent of the public financing benefit for 9the office of justice or $500, whichever is greater.AB1141,9,121011.1505 Personal funds of candidates. (1) The personal funds of a 11candidate contributed as seed money contributions may not exceed an aggregate 12amount of $5,000.AB1141,9,1513(2) No eligible candidate or candidate committee of an eligible candidate may 14make any disbursement derived from personal funds after the close of the public 15financing qualifying period.AB1141,9,231611.1506 Seed money contributions. (1) The candidate committee of an 17eligible candidate may accept seed money contributions from any individual, 18committee, or other person, not including an independent expenditure committee, 19prior to the end of the public financing qualifying period, provided the total 20contributions received from one contributor, except personal funds and qualifying 21contributions otherwise permitted under this subchapter, do not exceed $100 and 22the aggregate contributions, including personal funds, but not including qualifying 23contributions, do not exceed $5,000.AB1141,9,2424(2) The candidate committee of an eligible candidate may make 1disbursements derived from seed money contributions only during the exploratory 2period and the public financing qualifying period. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1141 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1141 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1141 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1141 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1141: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting